Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202080-1001
Service providers; intake forms and interviews; question regarding military service; departments; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services and Department of Veterans' Affairs shall work jointly to encourage service providers in their respective departments and in other state and local agencies and departments to ask the question "Have you or a family member ever served in the military?". The question should be included in intake forms and interviews where appropriate, including, but not limited to, at hospitals, mental health care centers, senior centers, employment offices, courts, and schools and in encounters with law enforcement.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 46.